Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,111
Insolvent banks; priority; not affected by federal deposit insurance.

When a bank whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation becomes insolvent, neither the deposits in the bank nor the exchange of such bank shall be deemed to be otherwise secured by reason of such insurance for purposes of section 8-1,110.

Laws 1935, c. 16, § 2, p. 91;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,102;

R.S.1943, § 8-197;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 111, p. 181;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 108.